Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2256
Volunteers; use of.

Nothing in the Nebraska Probation Administration Act shall be construed to prohibit any court or probation office from utilizing volunteers from the community for probation supervision. The volunteer program shall be supervised by a full-time probation officer who meets the minimum qualifications established by the office.

Laws 1971, LB 680, § 11;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 14.